California statutes. Civil Code
(1) The borrower is in compliance with the terms of a written trial or permanent loan modification, forbearance, or repayment plan.

(2) A foreclosure prevention
 alternative has been approved in writing by all parties, including, for example, the first lien investor, junior lienholder, and mortgage insurer, as applicable, and proof of funds or financing has been provided to the servicer.

(c) When a borrower accepts an offered first lien loan modification or other foreclosure prevention alternative, the mortgage servicer shall provide the borrower with a copy of the fully executed loan modification agreement or agreement evidencing the foreclosure prevention alternative following receipt of the executed copy from the borrower.

(d) A mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall record a rescission of a notice of default or cancel a pending trustee’s sale, if applicable, upon the borrower executing a permanent foreclosure prevention alternative. In the case of a short sale, the cancellation of the pending trustee’s sale shall occur when
 the short sale has been approved by all parties and proof of funds or financing has been provided to the mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent.

(e) The mortgage servicer shall not charge any application, processing, or other fee for a first lien loan modification or other foreclosure prevention alternative.

(f) The mortgage servicer shall not collect any late fees for periods during which a complete first lien loan modification application is under consideration or a denial is being appealed, the borrower is making timely modification payments, or a foreclosure prevention alternative is being evaluated or exercised.

(g) If a borrower has been approved in writing for a first lien loan modification or other foreclosure prevention alternative, and the servicing of that borrower’s loan is transferred or sold to
 another mortgage servicer, the subsequent mortgage servicer shall continue to honor any previously approved first lien loan modification or other foreclosure prevention alternative, in accordance with the provisions of the act that added this section.

(h) This section shall apply only to mortgages or deeds of trust described in Section 2924.15.

(i) This section shall not apply to entities described in subdivision (b) of Section 2924.18.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 404, Sec. 16.   (SB 818)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.12.

(a) (1) If a trustee’s deed upon sale has not been recorded, a borrower may bring an action for injunctive relief to enjoin a material violation of Section 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, or 2924.17.

(2) Any injunction shall remain in place and any trustee’s sale shall be enjoined until the court determines that the mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent has corrected and remedied the violation or violations giving rise to the action for injunctive relief. An enjoined entity may move to dissolve an injunction based on a showing that the material violation has been corrected and remedied.

(b) After a trustee’s deed upon sale has
 been recorded, a mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall be liable to a borrower for actual economic damages pursuant to Section 3281, resulting from a material violation of Section 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, or 2924.17 by that mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent where the violation was not corrected and remedied prior to the recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale. If the court finds that the material violation was intentional or reckless, or resulted from willful misconduct by a mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent, the court may award the borrower the greater of treble actual damages or statutory damages of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(c) A mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not be liable for any violation that it has corrected and remedied prior to the
 recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale, or that has been corrected and remedied by third parties working on its behalf prior to the recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale.

(d) A violation of Section 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, or 2924.17 by a person licensed by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Department of Real Estate shall be deemed to be a violation of that person’s licensing law.

(e) No violation of this article shall affect the validity of a sale in favor of a bona fide purchaser and any of its encumbrancers for value without notice.

(f) A third-party encumbrancer shall not be relieved of liability resulting from violations of Section 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, or 2924.17 committed by that third-party encumbrancer, that occurred
 prior to the sale of the subject property to the bona fide purchaser.

(g) The rights, remedies, and procedures provided by this section are in addition to and independent of any other rights, remedies, or procedures under any other law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter, limit, or negate any other rights, remedies, or procedures provided by law.

(h) A court may award a prevailing borrower reasonable attorney’s fees and costs in an action brought pursuant to this section. A borrower shall be deemed to have prevailed for purposes of this subdivision if the borrower obtained injunctive relief or was awarded damages pursuant to this section.

(i) This section shall not apply to entities described in subdivision (b) of Section 2924.18.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 31.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.13.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Borrower” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2929.5.

(2) “Mortgage servicer” includes the current mortgage servicer and any prior mortgage servicers.

(3) “Subordinate mortgage” means a security instrument in residential real property, including a deed of trust and any security instrument that functions in the form of a mortgage, that was, at the time it was recorded, subordinate to another security interest encumbering the same residential real property.

(b) The following conduct constitutes an unlawful practice
 in connection with a subordinate mortgage:

(1) The mortgage servicer did not provide the borrower with any written communication regarding the loan secured by the mortgage for at least three years.

(2) The mortgage servicer failed to provide a transfer of loan servicing notice to the borrower when required to provide that notice by law, including, but not limited to, the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), and investor or guarantor requirements.

(3) The mortgage servicer failed to provide a transfer of loan ownership notice to the borrower when required to provide that notice by law, including, but not limited to, the federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. 1601, et seq.), and investor or guarantor requirements.

(4) The mortgage servicer conducted or threatened to conduct a foreclosure sale after providing a form to the borrower indicating that the debt had been written off or discharged, including, but not limited to, an Internal Revenue Service Form 1099.

(5) The mortgage servicer conducted or threatened to conduct a foreclosure sale after the applicable statute of limitations expired.

(6) The mortgage servicer failed to provide a periodic account statement to the borrower when required to provide that statement by law, including, but not limited to, the federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. 1601, et seq.), and investor or guarantor requirements.

(c) A mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not conduct or
 threaten to conduct a nonjudicial foreclosure until the mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent does both of the following:

(1) Simultaneously with the recording of a notice of default, records or causes to be recorded, in the office of the county recorder of the county that the encumbered property is located, a certification under penalty of perjury that either:

(A) The mortgage servicer did not engage in an unlawful practice as described in subdivision (b).

(B) The mortgage servicer lists all instances when it committed an unlawful practice as described in subdivision (b).

(2) Simultaneously with the service of a recorded notice of default, sends both of the following documents to the borrower by United States certified
 mail with return receipt requested to the last known mailing address of the borrower:

(A) A notice providing that if the borrower believes the mortgage servicer engaged in an unlawful practice described in subdivision (b) or misrepresented its compliance history, the borrower may petition the court for relief before the foreclosure sale.

(B) A copy of the certification recorded pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) Upon a borrower’s petition to the court for relief before the foreclosure sale, the court shall enjoin a proposed foreclosure sale pursuant to a power of sale in a subordinate mortgage until a final determination on the petition has been made.

(e) It shall be an affirmative defense in a judicial foreclosure proceeding if the court finds the mortgage
 servicer engaged in any of the unlawful practices specified in subdivision (b).

(f) The court may provide equitable remedies that the court deems appropriate, depending on the extent and severity of the mortgage servicer’s violations. The equitable remedies may include, but are not limited to, striking all or a portion of the arrears claim, barring foreclosure, or permitting foreclosure subject to future compliance and corrected arrearage claim.

(g) A borrower may also petition the court to set a nonjudicial foreclosure sale aside when a certification required by subdivision (c) was never recorded or when a certification recorded pursuant to subdivision (c) indicates that the mortgage servicer engaged in an unlawful practice described in subdivision (b) or misrepresented its compliance history.

(h) Any failure to
 comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of a trustee’s sale or a sale in favor of a bona fide purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 2.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.15.

(a) Unless otherwise provided, paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2924 and Sections 2923.5, 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, and 2924.18 shall apply only to a first lien mortgage or deed of trust that is secured by owner-occupied residential real property containing no more than four dwelling units.

(b) For purposes of this section, “owner-occupied” means that the property is the principal residence of the borrower and is security for a loan made for personal, family, or household purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 601, Sec. 3.   (SB 1146)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.17.

(a) A declaration recorded pursuant to Section 2923.5 or pursuant to Section 2923.55, a notice of default, notice of sale, assignment of a deed of trust, or substitution of trustee recorded by or on behalf of a mortgage servicer in connection with a foreclosure subject to the requirements of Section 2924, or a declaration or affidavit filed in any court relative to a foreclosure proceeding shall be accurate and complete and supported by competent and reliable evidence.

(b) Before recording or filing any of the documents described in subdivision (a), a mortgage servicer shall ensure that it has reviewed competent and reliable evidence to substantiate the borrower’s default and the right to foreclose, including the borrower’s loan status and loan information.

(c) Any mortgage servicer that engages in multiple and repeated uncorrected violations of subdivision (b) in recording documents or filing documents in any court relative to a foreclosure proceeding shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per mortgage or deed of trust in an action brought by a government entity identified in Section 17204 of the Business and Professions Code, or in an administrative proceeding brought by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Department of Real Estate against a respective licensee, in addition to any other remedies available to these entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 32.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.18.

(a) (1) If a borrower submits a complete application for a first lien loan modification offered by, or through, the borrower’s mortgage servicer at least five business days before a scheduled foreclosure sale, a mortgage servicer, trustee, mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not record a notice of default, notice of sale, or conduct a trustee’s sale while the complete first lien loan modification application is pending, and until the borrower has been provided with a written determination by the mortgage servicer regarding that borrower’s eligibility for the requested loan modification.

(2) If a foreclosure prevention alternative has been approved in writing prior to the recordation of a notice of default, a mortgage servicer,
 mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not record a notice of default under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The borrower is in compliance with the terms of a written trial or permanent loan modification, forbearance, or repayment plan.

(B) A foreclosure prevention alternative has been approved in writing by all parties, including, for example, the first lien investor, junior lienholder, and mortgage insurer, as applicable, and proof of funds or financing has been provided to the servicer.

(3) If a foreclosure prevention alternative is approved in writing after the recordation of a notice of default, a mortgage servicer, mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not record a notice of sale or conduct a trustee’s sale under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The borrower is in compliance with the terms of a written trial or permanent loan modification, forbearance, or repayment plan.

(B) A foreclosure prevention alternative has been approved in writing by all parties, including, for example, the first lien investor, junior lienholder, and mortgage insurer, as applicable, and proof of funds or financing has been provided to the servicer.

(b) This section shall apply to both of the following:

(1) A depository institution chartered under state or federal law, a person licensed pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code, or a person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and
 Professions Code, that, during its immediately preceding annual reporting period, as established with its primary regulator, foreclosed on 175 or fewer residential real properties, containing no more than four dwelling units, that are located in California.

(2) A person or entity that services seven or fewer loans encumbering residential real property located in California in a calendar year.

(c) Within three months after the close of any calendar year or annual reporting period as established with its primary regulator during which an entity or person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) exceeds the threshold of 175 specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), that entity shall notify its primary regulator, in a manner acceptable to its primary regulator, and any mortgagor or trustor who is delinquent on a residential mortgage loan serviced by that entity of the date
 on which that entity will be subject to Sections 2923.55, 2923.6, 2923.7, 2924.9, 2924.10, 2924.11, and 2924.12, which date shall be the first day of the first month that is six months after the close of the calendar year or annual reporting period during which that entity exceeded the threshold.

(d) For purposes of this section, an application shall be deemed “complete” when a borrower has supplied the mortgage servicer with all documents required by the mortgage servicer within the reasonable timeframes specified by the mortgage servicer.

(e) If a borrower has been approved in writing for a first lien loan modification or other foreclosure prevention alternative, and the servicing of the borrower’s loan is transferred or sold to another mortgage servicer, the subsequent mortgage servicer shall continue to honor any previously approved first lien loan modification or other
 foreclosure prevention alternative, in accordance with the provisions of the act that added this section.

(f) This section shall apply only to mortgages or deeds of trust described in Section 2924.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 6.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.19.

(a) (1) If a trustee’s deed upon sale has not been recorded, a borrower may bring an action for injunctive relief to enjoin a material violation of Section 2923.5, 2924.17, or 2924.18.

(2) An injunction shall remain in place and any trustee’s sale shall be enjoined until the court determines that the mortgage servicer, mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent has corrected and remedied the violation or violations giving rise to the action for injunctive relief. An enjoined entity may move to dissolve an injunction based on a showing that the material violation has been corrected and remedied.

(b) After a trustee’s deed upon sale has been recorded, a mortgage servicer,
 mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall be liable to a borrower for actual economic damages pursuant to Section 3281, resulting from a material violation of Section 2923.5, 2924.17, or 2924.18 by that mortgage servicer, mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent where the violation was not corrected and remedied prior to the recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale. If the court finds that the material violation was intentional or reckless, or resulted from willful misconduct by a mortgage servicer, mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent, the court may award the borrower the greater of treble actual damages or statutory damages of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(c) A mortgage servicer, mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall not be liable for any violation that it has corrected and remedied prior to the recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale, or that has been corrected and remedied by third parties working
 on its behalf prior to the recordation of the trustee’s deed upon sale.

(d) A violation of Section 2923.5, 2924.17, or 2924.18 by a person licensed by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Department of Real Estate shall be deemed to be a violation of that person’s licensing law.

(e) A violation of this article shall not affect the validity of a sale in favor of a bona fide purchaser and any of its encumbrancers for value without notice.

(f) A third-party encumbrancer shall not be relieved of liability resulting from violations of Section 2923.5, 2924.17, or 2924.18, committed by that third-party encumbrancer, that occurred prior to the sale of the subject property to the bona fide purchaser.

(g) The rights, remedies, and
 procedures provided by this section are in addition to and independent of any other rights, remedies, or procedures under any other law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter, limit, or negate any other rights, remedies, or procedures provided by law.

(h) A court may award a prevailing borrower reasonable attorney’s fees and costs in an action brought pursuant to this section. A borrower shall be deemed to have prevailed for purposes of this subdivision if the borrower obtained injunctive relief or damages pursuant to this section.

(i) This section shall apply only to entities described in subdivision (b) of Section 2924.18.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 33.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.20.

Consistent with their general regulatory authority, and notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2924.18, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Bureau of Real Estate may adopt regulations applicable to any entity or person under their respective jurisdictions that are necessary to carry out the purposes of the act that added this section. A violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall only be enforceable by the regulatory agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 34.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.21.

A person shall not contact, solicit, or initiate communication with an owner to claim the surplus funds from a foreclosure sale of the owner’s residence before 90 days after the trustee’s deed has been recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 142, Sec. 2.   (AB 295)   Effective July 18, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.26.

(a) Unless acting in the capacity of a trustee, a licensed title company or underwritten title company shall not be liable for a violation of Section 2923.5 or 2924.11 if it records or causes to record a notice of default or notice of sale at the request of a trustee, substitute trustee, or beneficiary, in good faith and in the normal course of its business activities.

(b) This section shall
 become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 251, Sec. 2.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2924a.

If, by the terms of any trust or deed of trust a power of sale is conferred upon the trustee, the attorney for the trustee, or any duly authorized agent, may conduct the sale and act in the sale as the auctioneer for the trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 575, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2924b.

(a) Any person desiring a copy of any notice of default and of any notice of sale under any deed of trust or mortgage with power of sale upon real property or an estate for years therein, as to which deed of trust or mortgage the power of sale cannot be exercised until these notices are given for the time and in the manner provided in Section 2924 may, at any time subsequent to recordation of the deed of trust or mortgage and prior to recordation of notice of default thereunder, cause to be filed for record in the office of the recorder of any county in which any part or parcel of the real property is situated, a duly acknowledged request for a copy of the notice of default and of sale. This request shall be signed and acknowledged by the person making the request, specifying the name and address of the person to whom the notice
 is to be mailed, shall identify the deed of trust or mortgage by stating the names of the parties thereto, the date of recordation thereof, and the book and page where the deed of trust or mortgage is recorded or the recorder’s number, and shall be in substantially the following form: “In accordance with Section 2924b, Civil Code, request is hereby 
made that a copy of any notice of default and a copy of any notice of sale 
under the deed of trust (or mortgage) recorded ______, ____, in Book 
_____ page ____ records of ____ County, (or filed for record with 
recorder’s serial number ____, _______ County) California, executed 
by ____ as trustor (or mortgagor) in which ________ is named as 
beneficiary (or mortgagee)
 and ______________ as trustee be mailed to at .NameAddressNOTICE: A copy of any notice of default and of any notice of sale will be 
sent only to the address contained in this recorded request. If your address changes, a new request must be recorded. 
Signature ”

Upon the filing for record of the request, the recorder shall index in the general index of grantors the names of the trustors (or mortgagors) recited therein and the names of persons requesting copies.

(b) The mortgagee, trustee, or other person authorized to record the notice of default or the notice of sale shall do each of the following:

(1) Within 10 business days following recordation of
 the notice of default, deposit or cause to be deposited in the United States mail an envelope, sent by registered or certified mail with postage prepaid, containing a copy of the notice with the recording date shown thereon, addressed to each person whose name and address are set forth in a duly recorded request therefor, directed to the address designated in the request and to each trustor or mortgagor at his or her last known address if different than the address specified in the deed of trust or mortgage with power of sale.

(2) At least 20 days before the date of sale, deposit or cause to be deposited in the United States mail an envelope, sent by registered or certified mail with postage prepaid, containing a copy of the notice of the time and place of sale, addressed to each person whose name and address are set forth in a duly recorded request therefor, directed to the address designated in the request and to each trustor or mortgagor at
 his or her last known address if different than the address specified in the deed of trust or mortgage with power of sale.

(3) As used in paragraphs (1) and (2), the “last known address” of each trustor or mortgagor means the last business or residence physical address actually known by the mortgagee, beneficiary, trustee, or other person authorized to record the notice of default. For the purposes of this subdivision, an address is “actually known” if it is contained in the original deed of trust or mortgage, or in any subsequent written notification of a change of physical address from the trustor or mortgagor pursuant to the deed of trust or mortgage. For the purposes of this subdivision, “physical address” does not include an email or any form of electronic address for a trustor or mortgagor. The beneficiary shall inform the trustee of the trustor’s last address actually known by the beneficiary. However, the trustee shall incur no
 liability for failing to send any notice to the last address unless the trustee has actual knowledge of it.

(4) A “person authorized to record the notice of default or the notice of sale” shall include an agent for the mortgagee or beneficiary, an agent of the named trustee, any person designated in an executed substitution of trustee, or an agent of that substituted trustee.

(c) The mortgagee, trustee, or other person authorized to record the notice of default or the notice of sale shall do the following:

(1) Within one month following recordation of the notice of default, deposit or cause to be deposited in the United States mail an envelope, sent by registered or certified mail with postage prepaid, containing a copy of the notice with the recording date shown thereon, addressed to each person set forth in
 paragraph (2), provided that the estate or interest of any person entitled to receive notice under this subdivision is acquired by an instrument sufficient to impart constructive notice of the estate or interest in the land or portion thereof that is subject to the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed, and provided the instrument is recorded in the office of the county recorder so as to impart that constructive notice prior to the recording date of the notice of default and provided the instrument as so recorded sets forth a mailing address that the county recorder shall use, as instructed within the instrument, for the return of the instrument after recording, and which address shall be the address used for the purposes of mailing notices herein.

(2) The persons to whom notice shall be mailed under this subdivision are:

(A) The successor in interest, as of the recording
 date of the notice of default, of the estate or interest or any portion thereof of the trustor or mortgagor of the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed.

(B) The beneficiary or mortgagee of any deed of trust or mortgage recorded subsequent to the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed, or recorded prior to or concurrently with the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed but subject to a recorded agreement or a recorded statement of subordination to the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed.

(C) The assignee of any interest of the beneficiary or mortgagee described in subparagraph (B), as of the recording date of the notice of default.

(D) The vendee of any contract of sale, or the lessee of any lease, of the estate or interest being foreclosed that is recorded subsequent to the deed of trust or
 mortgage being foreclosed, or recorded prior to or concurrently with the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed but subject to a recorded agreement or statement of subordination to the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed.

(E) The successor in interest to the vendee or lessee described in subparagraph (D), as of the recording date of the notice of default.

(F) The office of the Controller, Sacramento, California, where, as of the recording date of the notice of default, a “Notice of Lien for Postponed Property Taxes” has been recorded against the real property to which the notice of default applies.

(G) (i) The office of the Director of Housing and Community Development, Sacramento, California, and the office of the Executive Director of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee,
 Sacramento, California, respectively, where, as of the recording date of the notice of default, a use restriction, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.11 of the Government Code, has been recorded against the real property to which the notice of default applies.

(ii) Any failure to comply with the provisions of this subparagraph shall not affect the validity of a trustee’s sale or a sale in favor of a bona fide purchaser.

(3) At least 20 days before the date of sale, deposit or cause to be deposited in the United States mail an envelope, sent by registered or certified mail with postage prepaid, containing a copy of the notice of the time and place of sale addressed to each person to whom a copy of the notice of default is to be mailed as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2), and addressed to the office of any state taxing agency, Sacramento, California, that has recorded,
 subsequent to the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed, a notice of tax lien prior to the recording date of the notice of default against the real property to which the notice of default applies.

(4) Provide a copy of the notice of sale to the Internal Revenue Service, in accordance with Section 7425 of the Internal Revenue Code and any applicable federal regulation, if a “Notice of Federal Tax Lien under Internal Revenue Laws” has been recorded, subsequent to the deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed, against the real property to which the notice of sale applies. The failure to provide the Internal Revenue Service with a copy of the notice of sale pursuant to this paragraph shall be sufficient cause to rescind the trustee’s sale and invalidate the trustee’s deed, at the option of either the successful bidder at the trustee’s sale or the trustee, and in either case with the consent of the beneficiary. Any option to rescind the
 trustee’s sale pursuant to this paragraph shall be exercised prior to any transfer of the property by the successful bidder to a bona fide purchaser for value. A rescission of the trustee’s sale pursuant to this paragraph may be recorded in a notice of rescission pursuant to Section 1058.5.

(5) The mailing of notices in the manner set forth in paragraph (1) shall not impose upon any licensed attorney, agent, or employee of any person entitled to receive notices as herein set forth any duty to communicate the notice to the entitled person from the fact that the mailing address used by the county recorder is the address of the attorney, agent, or employee.

(d) Any deed of trust or mortgage with power of sale hereafter executed upon real property or an estate for years therein may contain a request that a copy of any notice of default and a copy of any notice of sale thereunder shall
 be mailed to any person or party thereto at the address of the person given therein, and a copy of any notice of default and of any notice of sale shall be mailed to each of these at the same time and in the same manner required as though a separate request therefor had been filed by each of these persons as herein authorized. If any deed of trust or mortgage with power of sale executed after September 19, 1939, except a deed of trust or mortgage of any of the classes excepted from the provisions of Section 2924, does not contain a mailing address of the trustor or mortgagor therein named, and if no request for special notice by the trustor or mortgagor in substantially the form set forth in this section has subsequently been recorded, a copy of the notice of default shall be published once a week for at least four weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is situated, the publication to commence within 10 business days after the filing of the notice of default. In lieu
 of publication, a copy of the notice of default may be delivered personally to the trustor or mortgagor within the 10 business days or at any time before publication is completed, or by posting the notice of default in a conspicuous place on the property and mailing the notice to the last known address of the trustor or mortgagor.

(e) Any person required to mail a copy of a notice of default or notice of sale to each trustor or mortgagor pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) by registered or certified mail shall simultaneously cause to be deposited in the United States mail, with postage prepaid and mailed by first-class mail, an envelope containing an additional copy of the required notice addressed to each trustor or mortgagor at the same address to which the notice is sent by registered or certified mail pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c). The person shall execute and retain an affidavit identifying the notice mailed, showing the name and
 residence or business address of that person, that he or she is over 18 years of age, the date of deposit in the mail, the name and address of the trustor or mortgagor to whom sent, and that the envelope was sealed and deposited in the mail with postage fully prepaid. In the absence of fraud, the affidavit required by this subdivision shall establish a conclusive presumption of mailing.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to separate interests governed by an association, as defined in Section 4080 or 6528, the association may cause to be filed in the office of the recorder in the county in which the separate interests are situated a request that a mortgagee, trustee, or other person authorized to record a notice of default regarding any of those separate interests mail to the association a copy of any trustee’s deed upon sale concerning a separate interest. The request shall include a legal description or
 the assessor’s parcel number of all the separate interests. A request recorded pursuant to this subdivision shall include the name and address of the association and a statement that it is an association as defined in Section 4080 or 6528. Subsequent requests of an association shall supersede prior requests. A request pursuant to this subdivision shall be recorded before the filing of a notice of default. The mortgagee, trustee, or other authorized person shall mail the requested information to the association within 15 business days following the date of the trustee’s sale. Failure to mail the request, pursuant to this subdivision, shall not affect the title to real property.

(2) A request filed pursuant to paragraph (1) does not, for purposes of Section 27288.1 of the Government Code, constitute a document that either effects or evidences a transfer or encumbrance of an interest in real property or that releases or terminates any interest,
 right, or encumbrance of an interest in real property.

(g) No request for a copy of any notice filed for record pursuant to this section, no statement or allegation in the request, and no record thereof shall affect the title to real property or be deemed notice to any person that any person requesting copies of notice has or claims any right, title, or interest in, or lien or charge upon the property described in the deed of trust or mortgage referred to therein.

(h) “Business day,” as used in this section, has the meaning specified in Section 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (AB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2924c.

(a) (1) Whenever all or a portion of the principal sum of any obligation secured by deed of trust or mortgage on real property or an estate for years therein hereafter executed has, prior to the maturity date fixed in that obligation, become due or been declared due by reason of default in payment of interest or of any installment of principal, or by reason of failure of trustor or mortgagor to pay, in accordance with the terms of that obligation or of the deed of trust or mortgage, taxes, assessments, premiums for insurance, or advances made by beneficiary or mortgagee in accordance with the terms of that obligation or of the deed of trust or mortgage, the trustor or mortgagor or their successor in interest in the mortgaged or trust property or any part thereof, or any beneficiary under a subordinate
 deed of trust or any other person having a subordinate lien or encumbrance of record thereon, at any time within the period specified in subdivision (e), if the power of sale therein is to be exercised, or, otherwise at any time prior to entry of the decree of foreclosure, may pay to the beneficiary or the mortgagee or their successors in interest, respectively, the entire amount due, at the time payment is tendered, with respect to (A) all amounts of principal, interest, taxes, assessments, insurance premiums, or advances actually known by the beneficiary to be, and that are, in default and shown in the notice of default, under the terms of the deed of trust or mortgage and the obligation secured thereby, (B) all amounts in default on recurring obligations not shown in the notice of default, and (C) all reasonable costs and expenses, subject to subdivision (c), that are actually incurred, or will be incurred as a direct result of the payment being tendered, in enforcing the terms of the obligation, deed of